Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 5. Blood Tests for Pregnant Women

§ 35-4-501.
Definition of standard serological test; cost.

For the purposes of this act [§§

35-4-501

through

35-4-505

], a standard serological test shall be a test for syphilis approved by the state department of health, and shall be performed in a laboratory approved by the state department of health. Such laboratory tests as are required by this act shall be performed on request without charge at the state department of health laboratory.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 72, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 63-402; W.S. 1957, § 35-207; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

§ 35-4-502.
Duty of attending physician.

Every physician licensed to practice medicine attending a pregnant woman in the state for conditions relating to her pregnancy during the period of gestation or at delivery shall take, or cause to be taken, a sample of blood of such woman at the time of her first professional visit or within ten (10) days thereafter. The blood specimen thus obtained shall be submitted to an approved laboratory for a standard serological test for syphilis. Every other person permitted by law to attend pregnant women in the state but not permitted by law to take blood samples, shall cause a sample of blood of such pregnant women to be taken by a physician duly licensed to practice medicine and have such sample submitted to an approved laboratory for a standard serological test for syphilis.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 72, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 63-401; W.S. 1957, § 35-208.

Cross references. —

As to duty to introduce solution into eyes of newborn infants, see §

35-4-138

.

§ 35-4-503.
Report of birth; statement as to blood test.

In reporting every birth and stillbirth, physicians and others required to make such reports shall state on the certificate whether a blood test for syphilis has been made upon a specimen of blood taken from the woman who bore the child for which a birth or stillbirth certificate is filed, and the approximate date when the specimen was taken. In no event shall the birth certificate state the result of the test.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 72, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 63-403; W.S. 1957, § 35-209.

Cross references. —

As to stillbirth registration, see §

35-1-419

.

§ 35-4-504.
Penalty.

Any licensed physician and surgeon, or other person, engaged in attendance upon a pregnant woman during the period of gestation and/or at delivery, or any representative of a laboratory who violates the provisions of this act [§§

35-4-501

through

35-4-505

] shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00); provided, however, every licensed physician and surgeon or other person engaged in attendance upon a pregnant woman during the period of gestation or at delivery, who requests such specimen in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

35-4-502

, and whose request is refused, shall not be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 72, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 63-404; W.S. 1957, § 35-210.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for incorrectly diagnosing existence or nature of pregnancy, 2 ALR5th 769.

§ 35-4-505.
Enforcement.

The district attorneys for the several counties in the state shall prosecute for violation of this act [§§

35-4-501

through

35-4-505

] as for other crimes and misdemeanors.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 72, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 63-405; W.S. 1957, § 35-211; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 6, ch. 72, Laws 1941, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.